Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1578
Commission; rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate appropriate rules and regulations necessary for the administration of the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund.

Laws 1977, LB 450, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 236, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 28.